en: Toy kitchen interactive features: Bluetooth/app connectivity; Clickable knobs; Cooktop sizzling simulation; Ice maker/dispenser play; Light effects; Magnetic/interactive surfaces; Opening doors; Oven timer/clock; Pretend food prep (sliceable/velcro); Removable sink; Running water pump; Sound effects; Steam/mist effect; Storage compartments; Other
th: ชุดครัวของเล่นแบบโต้ตอบได้: การเชื่อมต่อบลูทูธ/แอป; ลูกบิดที่หมุนแล้วมีเสียงคลิก; เสียงจำลองการทำอาหารบนเตา; ของเล่นเครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง/ตู้กดน้ำ; เอฟเฟกต์ไฟ; พื้นผิวแม่เหล็ก/โต้ตอบได้; ประตูเปิดได้; นาฬิกาจับเวลาเตาอบ/นาฬิกา; เตรียมอาหารจำลอง (หั่นได้/แถบตีนตุ๊กแก); อ่างล้างจานถอดออกได้; ปั๊มน้ำไหล; เอฟเฟกต์เสียง; เอฟเฟกต์ไอน้ำ/ละอองน้ำ; ช่องเก็บของ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Cozinha de brinquedo recursos interativos: Conectividade Bluetooth/app; Botões clicáveis; Simulação de fritura no fogão; Brincadeira com máquina de gelo/dispenser; Efeitos de luz; Superfícies magnéticas/interativas; Portas que se abrem; Timer/relógio de forno; Preparo de comida de mentirinha (cortável/velcro); Pia removível; Bomba de água corrente; Efeitos sonoros; Efeito de vapor/névoa; Compartimentos de armazenamento; Outros
fi: Lelukeittiön interaktiiviset ominaisuudet: Bluetooth-/sovellusyhteys; Napsautettavat nupit; Keittotason sihinän simulointi; Jääpalakoneen/-annostelijan leikki; Valotehosteet; Magneettiset/interaktiiviset pinnat; Avattavat ovet; Uunin ajastin/kello; Leikkiruoan valmistus (leikattava/tarrakiinnitys); Irrotettava tiskiallas; Juoksevan veden pumppu; Äänitehosteet; Höyry-/sumuefekti; Säilytyslokerot; Muu
el: Διαδραστικά χαρακτηριστικά παιχνιδιού κουζίνας: Συνδεσιμότητα Bluetooth/εφαρμογής; Περιστρεφόμενα κουμπιά με ήχο κλικ; Προσομοίωση ήχου ψησίματος στην εστία; Παιχνίδι παγομηχανής/διανομέα πάγου; Φωτεινά εφέ; Μαγνητικές/διαδραστικές επιφάνειες; Πόρτες που ανοίγουν; Χρονόμετρο/ρολόι φούρνου; Προετοιμασία φαγητού (τεμαχιζόμενο/με velcro); Αφαιρούμενος νεροχύτης; Αντλία τρεχούμενου νερού; Ηχητικά εφέ; Εφέ ατμού/υδρατμών; Αποθηκευτικοί χώροι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Interaktivne lastnosti otroške kuhinje: Povezljivost Bluetooth/aplikacija; Vrtljivi gumbi s klikom; Simulacija cvrčanja na kuhališču; Ledomat/dozirnik za igro; Svetlobni učinki; Magnetne/interaktivne površine; Odpiranje vrat; Časovnik/ura za pečico; Priprava hrane za igro (rezanje/ježek); Odstranljivo pomivalno korito; Črpalka za tekočo vodo; Zvočni učinki; Učinek pare/meglice; Predali za shranjevanje; Drugo
de: Interaktive Funktionen der Spielzeugküche: Bluetooth-/App-Konnektivität; Drehknöpfe mit Klickgeräusch; Brutzel-Simulation für Herdplatte; Spiel-Eiswürfelbereiter/-spender; Lichteffekte; Magnetische/interaktive Oberflächen; Türen zum Öffnen; Ofen-Timer/Uhr; Lebensmittel-Zubereitung (schneidbar/Klettverschluss); Abnehmbare Spüle; Fließwasserpumpe; Soundeffekte; Dampf-/Nebeleffekt; Aufbewahrungsfächer; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 玩具厨房互动功能: 蓝牙/应用连接; 可点击旋钮; 炉口滋滋声模拟; 制冰机/饮水机游玩; 灯光效果; 磁性/互动表面; 开门; 烤箱定时器/时钟; 假装准备食物（可切/魔术贴）; 可拆卸水槽; 活水泵; 音效; 蒸汽/喷雾效果; 储物隔层; 其他
ja: おもちゃのキッチンインタラクティブ機能: Bluetooth / アプリ接続; カチカチ鳴るノブ; クックトップのジュージュー音シミュレーション; 製氷機 / ディスペンサー遊び; ライトエフェクト; マグネット / インタラクティブな表面; 開くドア; オーブンタイマー / 時計; おままごと調理 (スライス可能 / 面ファスナー); 取り外し可能なシンク; 流水ポンプ; サウンドエフェクト; スチーム / ミストエフェクト; 収納コンパートメント; その他
vi: Đồ chơi nhà bếp có các tính năng tương tác.: Kết nối Bluetooth/ứng dụng; Núm xoay có tiếng click; Mô phỏng tiếng xèo xèo của bếp; Chơi với máy làm đá/rót nước; Hiệu ứng ánh sáng; Bề mặt từ tính/tương tác; Cửa mở được; Bộ hẹn giờ/đồng hồ lò nướng; Chuẩn bị thức ăn mô phỏng (có thể cắt/khóa dán Velcro); Bồn rửa tháo rời được; Bơm nước đang chảy; Hiệu ứng âm thanh; Hiệu ứng hơi nước/sương mù; Ngăn chứa đồ; Khác
hr-HR: Interaktivne značajke kuhinje igračke: Bluetooth / povezivost s aplikacijom; Gumbi s klikom; Simulacija cvrčanja na štednjaku; Igra s ledomatom / dozatorom za led; Svjetlosni efekti; Magnetske/interaktivne površine; Vrata koja se otvaraju; Mjerač vremena na pećnici / sat; Priprema hrane za igru (na rezanje / čičak); Uklonjivi sudoper; Pumpa za tekuću vodu; Zvučni efekti; Efekt pare/maglice; Odjeljci za pohranu; Ostalo
pl: Interaktywne funkcje zabawkowej kuchni: Łączność Bluetooth/z aplikacją; Klikające pokrętła; Symulacja skwierczenia na płycie grzewczej; Zabawa w kostkarkę/dystrybutor lodu; Efekty świetlne; Powierzchnie magnetyczne/interaktywne; Otwierane drzwi; Minutnik/zegar piekarnika; Udawane przygotowywanie posiłków (do krojenia/na rzepy); Wyjmowany zlew; Pompa bieżącej wody; Efekty dźwiękowe; Efekt pary/mgiełki; Schowki; Inne
da: Interaktive funktioner for legetøjskøkken: Bluetooth-/app-tilslutning; Klikbare drejeknapper; Simuleret syde-lyd fra kogeplade; Lege-isterningemaskine/-dispenser; Lyseffekter; Magnetiske/interaktive overflader; Døre, der kan åbnes; Ovntimer/-ur; Lege-madlavning (kan skæres over/velcro); Aftagelig vask; Vandpumpe med rindende vand; Lydeffekter; Damp-/tågeeffekt; Opbevaringsrum; Andet
sk-SK: Interaktívne prvky hračkárskej kuchynky: Bluetooth/pripojenie k aplikácii; Klikacie gombíky; Simulácia prskania na varnej doske; Výrobník ľadu/dávkovač na hranie; Svetelné efekty; Magnetické/interaktívne povrchy; Otváracie dvierka; Časovač/hodiny rúry; Príprava jedla na hranie (krájacie/suchý zips); Odnímateľný drez; Pumpa s tečúcou vodou; Zvukové efekty; Efekt pary/hmly; Úložné priestory; Iné
hu: Játékkonyha interaktív funkciói: Bluetooth / alkalmazáskapcsolat; Kattogó gombok; Főzőlap sercegő hang; Jégkészítő / adagoló funkció; Fényeffektek; Mágneses / interaktív felületek; Nyitható ajtók; Sütőidőzítő / óra; Játék ételkészítés (szeletelhető / tépőzáras); Kivehető mosogató; Folyóvizes pumpa; Hangeffektek; Gőz / pára effektus; Tárolórekeszek; Egyéb
ro-RO: Caracteristici interactive ale bucătăriei de jucărie: Conectivitate Bluetooth/app; Butoane cu clic; Simulare sfârâit plită; Mașină de gheață/dozator de jucărie; Efecte luminoase; Suprafețe magnetice/interactive; Uși care se deschid; Temporizator/ceas pentru cuptor; Preparare de mâncare de jucărie (feliabilă/cu scai); Chiuvetă detașabilă; Pompă de apă funcțională; Efecte sonore; Efect de abur/ceață; Compartimente de depozitare; Altele
it: Caratteristiche interattive della cucina giocattolo: Connettività Bluetooth/app; Manopole cliccabili; Simulazione sfrigolio del piano cottura; Gioco macchina del ghiaccio/distributore; Effetti luminosi; Superfici magnetiche/interattive; Sportelli apribili; Timer del forno/orologio; Finto cibo da preparare (affettabile/velcro); Lavandino rimovibile; Pompa dell'acqua corrente; Effetti sonori; Effetto vapore/nebbia; Scomparti portaoggetti; Altro
lt-LT: Žaislinės virtuvės interaktyvios funkcijos: „Bluetooth“ / programėlės ryšys; Spragsinčios rankenėlės; Kaitlentės čirškėjimo simuliacija; Ledo gaminimo aparato / dalytuvo žaidimas; Šviesos efektai; Magnetiniai / interaktyvūs paviršiai; Atsidaromos durys; Orkaitės laikmatis / laikrodis; Žaislinis maisto ruošimas (pjaustoma / su lipukais); Išimama kriauklė; Veikiantis vandens siurblys; Garso efektai; Garų / miglos efektas; Laikymo skyriai; Kita
tr: Oyuncak mutfak interaktif özellikleri: Bluetooth/uygulama bağlantısı; Tıklanabilir düğmeler; Ocak cızırtısı simülasyonu; Buz yapıcı/dağıtıcı oyunu; Işık efektleri; Manyetik/etkileşimli yüzeyler; Açılan kapılar; Fırın zamanlayıcı/saat; Rol yapma yiyecek hazırlığı (dilimlenebilir/cırt cırtlı); Çıkarılabilir lavabo; Çalışan su pompası; Ses efektleri; Buhar/sis efekti; Saklama bölmeleri; Diğer
cs: Interaktivní prvky dětské kuchyňky: Připojení přes Bluetooth / aplikaci; Cvakající knoflíky; Simulace prskání na varné desce; Hrací výrobník/dávkovač ledu; Světelné efekty; Magnetické/interaktivní plochy; Otevírací dveře; Minutka/hodiny na troubě; Příprava jídla (krájecí potraviny / na suchý zip); Odnímatelný dřez; Vodní pumpa; Zvukové efekty; Efekt páry/mlhy; Úložné prostory; Jiné
bg-BG: Интерактивни функции на детска кухня: Свързаност с Bluetooth/приложение; Кликащи копчета; Симулация на цвърчене на котлона; Игра с ледогенератор/диспенсър; Светлинни ефекти; Магнитни/интерактивни повърхности; Отварящи се врати; Таймер на фурната / часовник; Ролева игра за приготвяне на храна (за рязане / велкро); Подвижна мивка; Помпа за течаща вода; Звукови ефекти; Ефект на пара/мъгла; Отделения за съхранение; Друго
nl: Speelgoedkeuken interactieve kenmerken: Bluetooth-/app-connectiviteit; Klikbare knoppen; Kookplaat met sissimulatie; Speel-ijsblokjesmachine/-dispenser; Lichteffecten; Magnetische/interactieve oppervlakken; Openslaande deuren; Oventimer/-klok; Speelvoedselbereiding (snijdbaar/klittenband); Uitneembare gootsteen; Stromendwaterpomp; Geluidseffecten; Stoom-/misteffect; Opbergvakken; Overig
ru: Интерактивные функции игрушечной кухни: Подключение по Bluetooth/к приложению; Поворотные ручки со щелчком; Имитация звука шипения на плите; Игровой льдогенератор/диспенсер; Световые эффекты; Магнитные/интерактивные поверхности; Открывающиеся дверцы; Таймер/часы на духовке; Игровая готовка (нарезка продуктов/липучки); Съемная раковина; Помпа с проточной водой; Звуковые эффекты; Эффект пара/дымки; Отсеки для хранения; Другое
pt-PT: Características interativas da cozinha de brinquedo: Conectividade Bluetooth/app; Botões que fazem clique; Simulação de fogão a chiar; Máquina/dispensador de gelo de brincar; Efeitos luminosos; Superfícies magnéticas/interativas; Portas que abrem; Temporizador de forno/relógio; Preparação de comida de brincar (fatiável/velcro); Lava-loiça amovível; Bomba de água corrente; Efeitos sonoros; Efeito de vapor/névoa; Compartimentos de arrumação; Outro
nb: Interaktive funksjoner for lekekjøkken: Bluetooth-/app-tilkobling; Klikkbare brytere; Simulering av steking på kokeplate; Isbitmaskin-/dispenser-lek; Lyseffekter; Magnetiske/interaktive overflater; Dører som kan åpnes; Ovnstimer/-klokke; Lekematforberedelse (kan skjæres / borrelås); Avtakbar vask; Vannpumpe for rennende vann; Lydeffekter; Damp-/tåkeeffekt; Oppbevaringsrom; Annet
sv: Interaktiva funktioner i leksaksköket: Bluetooth-/app-anslutning; Klickbara vred; Simulerat fräsande ljud för spishäll; Leksaks-ismaskin/-automat; Ljuseffekter; Magnetiska/interaktiva ytor; Öppningsbara dörrar; Ugnstimer/klocka; Låtsasmatlagning (skärbar/kardborre); Löstagbar diskho; Rinnande vattenpump; Ljudeffekter; Ång-/dimeffekt; Förvaringsfack; Övrigt
fr: Caractéristiques interactives de la cuisine jouet: Connectivité Bluetooth/appli; Boutons cliquables; Simulation de grésillement de plaque de cuisson; Machine à glaçons/distributeur interactif; Effets lumineux; Surfaces magnétiques/interactives; Portes ouvrantes; Minuterie de four/horloge; Préparation de faux aliments (à découper/velcro); Évier amovible; Pompe à eau courante; Effets sonores; Effet de vapeur/brume; Compartiments de rangement; Autre
ko: 장난감 주방의 상호작용 기능: 블루투스/앱 연결; 클릭 가능한 노브; 쿡탑 지글거림 시뮬레이션; 제빙기/디스펜서 놀이; 조명 효과; 자석/인터랙티브 표면; 열리는 문; 오븐 타이머/시계; 음식 준비 놀이(자르기 가능/벨크로); 탈착식 싱크대; 워터 펌프 작동; 사운드 효과; 스팀/미스트 효과; 수납공간; 기타
zh-TW: 玩具廚房互動功能: 藍牙/app 連線功能; 可按壓旋鈕; 爐具滋滋聲模擬; 製冰機/飲水機遊戲; 燈光效果; 磁性/互動表面; 可開關的門; 烤箱計時器/時鐘; 擬真備餐 (可切片/魔鬼氈); 可拆卸水槽; 活水幫浦; 音效; 蒸汽/噴霧效果; 收納隔間; 其他
es: Características interactivas de la cocina de juguete: Conectividad Bluetooth/app; Perillas con sonido de clic; Simulación de chisporroteo en la estufa; Dispensador/máquina de hielo de juguete; Efectos de luz; Superficies magnéticas/interactivas; Puertas que se abren; Temporizador/reloj de horno; Preparación de comida de juguete (para cortar/con velcro); Fregadero extraíble; Bomba de agua corriente; Efectos de sonido; Efecto de vapor/niebla; Compartimentos de almacenamiento; Otro